District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Petitioner” means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child-custody determination.

(2)

“Respondent” means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced for enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child-custody determination.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 301 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).